Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-680
Completed application; public hearing; when.

(1) After the Chief Water Officer has accepted the application made under section 46-677 as a completed application, the Chief Water Officer shall cause a notice of such application to be published at the applicant's expense at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published or of general circulation in each county containing land on which one or more water wells are proposed to be located. The notice shall include (a) the amount of ground water the applicant proposes to use, (b) a description of the proposed use and location of that use, (c) the number of water wells proposed at each location of withdrawal, and (d) any other information deemed necessary by the Chief Water Officer to provide adequate notice of the application to interested persons. The notice shall state that any interested person may object to and request a hearing on the application by filing written objections stating the grounds for each objection within two weeks after the date of final publication of the notice. Such objections shall be filed with the Chief Water Officer.

(2) The Chief Water Officer may hold a hearing on an application made under section 46-677 at his or her discretion and shall hold a hearing on such an application if requested by any interested person pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 36;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 96;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 194.